Colorado, session 2026A, HB1245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-4-401, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(e), and (1)(f); and add (1)(g) as follows:
18-4-401. Theft.
(1) A person commits theft when he or she THE PERSON knowingly
obtains, retains, or exercises control over anything of value of another
without authorization or by threat or deception; receives, loans money by
pawn or pledge on, or disposes of anything of value or belonging to
another that he or she THE PERSON knows or believes to have been stolen,
and:
(e) Knowingly retains the thing of value more than seventy-two
hours after the agreed-upon time of return in any lease or hire agreement;
or
(f) Intentionally misrepresents or withholds a material fact for
determining eligibility for a public benefit and does so for the purpose of
obtaining or retaining public benefits for which the person is not eligible;
OR
(g) WITH CRIMINAL NEGLIGENCE USES, TRANSFERS, OR DIVERTS
MONEY PROVIDED AS AN ADVANCE PAYMENT FOR A SPECIFIC
CONSTRUCTION PROJECT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 38-46-101 (4.5), AND
THE USE, TRANSFER, OR DIVERSION:
(I) IS FOR A PURPOSE UNRELATED TO THE SPECIFIC CONSTRUCTION
PROJECT FOR WHICH THE MONEY WAS PROVIDED; AND
(II) RESULTS IN UNREASONABLE DELAY, CESSATION, OR
ABANDONMENT OF THE SPECIFIC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT.
-2- 1245

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-46-101, add (4.5)
as follows:
38-46-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 46, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4.5) "SPECIFIC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT" MEANS THE
CONSTRUCTION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, OR IMPROVEMENT OF REAL
PROPERTY THAT IS IDENTIFIED IN A WRITTEN CONTRACT, ESTIMATE,
PROPOSAL, OR SCOPE OF WORK ACCEPTED BY THE CUSTOMER, INCLUDING
THE LOCATION OF THE PROPERTY AND THE WORK TO BE PERFORMED, FOR
WHICH AN ADVANCE PAYMENT IS PROVIDED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 2 to article
46 of title 38 as follows:
PART 2
ADVANCE PAYMENT USAGE DISCLOSURE
38-46-201. Advance payment usage disclosure by contractors.
(1) BEFORE ACCEPTING AN ADVANCE PAYMENT EXCEEDING THREE
HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR A SPECIFIC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT, A
CONTRACTOR SHALL PROVIDE THE CUSTOMER WITH A WRITTEN
DISCLOSURE THAT STATES:
(a) THE INTENDED USE OF THE ADVANCE PAYMENT, INCLUDING
MATERIALS, LABOR, PERMITS, OVERHEAD, OR OTHER PROJECT-RELATED
EXPENSES;
(b) THE ANTICIPATED TIMING OF THE IDENTIFIED EXPENSES;
(c) THE PROJECTED DATE ON WHICH THE WORK ON THE SPECIFIC
CONSTRUCTION PROJECT WILL BEGIN; AND
(d) THAT THE CONTRACTOR USING ADVANCE PAYMENT FUNDS IN
A MANNER THAT IS MATERIALLY INCONSISTENT WITH THE WRITTEN
-3- 1245

DISCLOSURE AND THAT RESULTS IN DELAY, CESSATION, OR ABANDONMENT
OF THE CONSTRUCTION PROJECT MAY CONSTITUTE THEFT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 18-4-401 (1)(g).
(2) EVIDENCE THAT A CONTRACTOR KNOWINGLY USED,
TRANSFERRED, OR DIVERTED ADVANCE PAYMENT MONEY FOR PURPOSES
UNRELATED TO THE WRITTEN DISCLOSURE MAY BE CONSIDERED EVIDENCE
OF THE INTENT REQUIRED FOR THEFT PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-4-401.
(3) FAILURE OF A CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE OR TO ADHERE TO THE
ADVANCE PAYMENT USAGE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION MAY BE CONSIDERED EVIDENCE OF USE, TRANSFER, OR DIVERSION
OF MONEY IN ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDING.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-46-102, amend
(1) introductory portion and (2) introductory portion as follows:
38-46-102. Applicability of part.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this article
46 PART 1 applies to:
(2) This article 46 PART 1 does not apply to:
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-46-103, amend
(2) introductory portion as follows:
38-46-103. Private construction contracts - retainage -
conditions precedent.
(2) This article 46 PART 1 addresses only the amount of retainage
that may be withheld by a property owner, contractor, or subcontractor
and does not change, override, or invalidate any other provision in a
contract, subcontract, or supply agreement. Such a provision includes, but
is not limited to:
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 38-46-104 as
-4- 1245

follows:
38-46-104. Lien waivers.
To receive payment under this article 46 PART 1, the recipient of
the payment must provide an executed lien waiver for amounts actually
paid if required by the contract, subcontract, or supply agreement.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect August 15, 2026; except that, if
a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official
declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to offenses committed on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-5- 1245